Illinois, session 104th, SB2169.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/11)  (from Ch. 116, par. 211)7    Sec. 11. (a) Any person denied access to inspect or copy 8any public record by a public body may file suit for injunctive 9or declaratory relief.10    (a-5) In accordance with Section 11.6 of this Act, a 11requester may file an action to enforce a binding opinion 12issued under Section 9.5 of this Act.13    (b) Where the denial is from a public body of the State, 14suit may be filed in the circuit court for the county where the 15public body has its principal office or where the person 16denied access resides.17    (c) Where the denial is from a municipality or other 18public body, except as provided in subsection (b) of this 19Section, suit may be filed in the circuit court for the county 20where the public body is located. If the denial includes a 21request for minutes or a verbatim record of a meeting of the 22public body closed to the public as provided in the Open 23Meetings Act that have not been previously made available for   SB2169- 2 -LRB104 08955 BDA 19010 b1public inspection, suit may be filed only under this 2subsection after a 60-day period following (i) the receipt of 3the request by the public body or (ii) the issuance of a 4binding or non-binding opinion from the Public Access 5Counselor under Section 9.5, whichever is later, to allow for 6review of the requested records as provided in Section 2.06 of 7the Open Meetings Act. 8    (d) The circuit court shall have the jurisdiction to 9enjoin the public body from withholding public records and to 10order the production of any public records improperly withheld 11from the person seeking access. If the public body can show 12that exceptional circumstances exist, and that the body is 13exercising due diligence in responding to the request, the 14court may retain jurisdiction and allow the agency additional 15time to complete its review of the records.16    (e) On motion of the plaintiff, prior to or after in camera 17inspection, the court shall order the public body to provide 18an index of the records to which access has been denied. The 19index shall include the following:20        (i) A description of the nature or contents of each 21    document withheld, or each deletion from a released 22    document, provided, however, that the public body shall 23    not be required to disclose the information which it 24    asserts is exempt; and25        (ii) A statement of the exemption or exemptions 26    claimed for each such deletion or withheld document.  SB2169- 3 -LRB104 08955 BDA 19010 b1    (f) In any action considered by the court, the court shall 2consider the matter de novo, and shall conduct such in camera 3examination of the requested records as it finds appropriate 4to determine if such records or any part thereof may be 5withheld under any provision of this Act. The burden shall be 6on the public body to establish that its refusal to permit 7public inspection or copying is in accordance with the 8provisions of this Act. Any public body that asserts that a 9record is exempt from disclosure has the burden of proving 10that it is exempt by clear and convincing evidence.11    (g) In the event of noncompliance with an order of the 12court to disclose, the court may enforce its order against any 13public official or employee so ordered or primarily 14responsible for such noncompliance through the court's 15contempt powers.16    (h) Except as to causes the court considers to be of 17greater importance, proceedings arising under this Section 18shall take precedence on the docket over all other causes and 19be assigned for hearing and trial at the earliest practicable 20date and expedited in every way.21    (i) If a person seeking the right to inspect or receive a 22copy of a public record prevails in a proceeding under this 23Section, the court shall award such person reasonable 24attorney's fees and costs. In determining what amount of 25attorney's fees is reasonable, the court shall consider the 26degree to which the relief obtained relates to the relief   SB2169- 4 -LRB104 08955 BDA 19010 b1sought. The changes contained in this subsection apply to an 2action filed on or after January 1, 2010 (the effective date of 3Public Act 96-542).4    (j) If the court determines that a public body willfully 5and intentionally failed to comply with this Act, or otherwise 6acted in bad faith, the court shall also impose upon the public 7body a civil penalty of not less than $2,500 nor more than 8$5,000 for each occurrence. In assessing the civil penalty, 9the court shall consider in aggravation or mitigation the 10budget of the public body and whether the public body has 11previously been assessed penalties for violations of this Act. 12The court may impose an additional penalty of up to $1,000 for 13each day the violation continues if:14        (1) the public body fails to comply with the court's 15    order after 30 days;16        (2) the court's order is not on appeal or stayed; and17        (3) the court does not grant the public body 18    additional time to comply with the court's order to 19    disclose public records.20    The changes contained in this subsection made by Public 21Act 96-542 apply to an action filed on or after January 1, 2010 22(the effective date of Public Act 96-542).23    (k) The changes to this Section made by this amendatory 24Act of the 99th General Assembly apply to actions filed on or 25after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 99th 26General Assembly.  SB2169- 5 -LRB104 08955 BDA 19010 b1(Source: P.A. 99-586, eff. 1-1-17; 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.)